Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,105
Inconsistent ordinances, resolutions, or regulations; superseded.

The Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act shall supersede ordinances, resolutions, or regulations, now or hereafter in effect, of the governing body of a municipality or county or of state agencies which are inconsistent with the act.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 28.